Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 87A.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Best practices. new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end for purposes of this chapter, the November 1999 revised edition of the National Rifle Association's Range Source Book: A Guide to Planning and Construction deleted text begin shall servedeleted text end new text begin servesnew text end as best practices for shooting range performance standards. new text begin (b) The shooting range performance standards under this chapter include a prohibition on possessing and using lead ammunition. To operate in compliance with the performance standards, a shooting range must only allow possession and use of nontoxic ammunition, except by peace officers or other government officials or employees when performing a duty required by law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 87A.10, is amended to read: 87A.10 SHOOTING SPORTS FACILITY GRANTS. The commissioner of natural resources deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end administer a program to provide cost-share grants to local recreational shooting clubs or local units of government for up to 50 percent of the costs of developing or rehabilitating shooting sports facilities for public use. A facility rehabilitated or developed with a grant under this section mustnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end be open to the general public at reasonable times and for a reasonable fee on a walk-in basisdeleted text begin . The commissioner shall give preference to projects that will provide the most opportunities for youth.deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) only allow possession and use of nontoxic ammunition; and new text end new text begin (3) include an educational component about the toxic effects of lead ammunition and about nontoxic alternatives. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2027, and applies to grants awarded on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.045, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Education about nontoxic ammunition. new text end new text begin The commissioner must include education about the toxic effects of lead ammunition and about nontoxic alternatives to lead ammunition as part of the department's overall effort in hunting recruitment and retention. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [325F.016] LEAD AMMUNITION; BAN. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning August 1, 2027, no manufacturer or wholesaler may sell or offer for sale lead ammunition in this state. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning August 1, 2028, no retailer may sell or offer for sale lead ammunition in this state. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [624.7193] LEAD AMMUNITION; BAN; DISPOSAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Ban. new text end new text begin Beginning August 1, 2028, a person must not use or possess lead ammunition. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Civil penalty. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is subject to the following civil penalties: new text end new text begin (1) $500 for the first offense; and new text end new text begin (2) at least $1,000 but no more than $5,000 for each subsequent offense. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disposal; buyback and exchange program. new text end new text begin (a) By August 1, 2028, a person who possesses lead ammunition must do one of the following: new text end new text begin (1) surrender the lead ammunition to a law enforcement agency for proper disposal; or new text end new text begin (2) remove the lead ammunition from the state. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent that funding is available, the commissioner of public safety must establish a program to buy back lead ammunition from residents and must provide opportunities for residents to exchange lead ammunition for nontoxic ammunition. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Public notice. new text end new text begin By March 1, 2027, the commissioners of public safety and natural resources must develop and implement a public service campaign designed to educate the public about the ban on lead ammunition. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 does not apply to peace officers or other government officials or employees when carrying out a duty required by law. new text end